Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1385SV (4) 91 th/ns S.F. 390 Section 1. Section 321E.3, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) The department may issue all-systems permits 3 under section 321E.8 which are valid for movement on all 4 paved highways or streets primary roads and secondary roads, 5 including roads designated by a local authority as a truck 6 route , except the interstate road system if prohibited 7 under section 321E.8 , and except any highways or streets 8 under the jurisdiction of local authorities upon which an 9 all-systems permit is road designated by the applicable local 10 authority as not valid as determined by the applicable local 11 authority for use by permitted vehicles if the local authority 12 indicates such highways and streets communicates the not-valid 13 designation to the department in writing, including by means 14 of electronic communication. However, all roads designated as 15 not valid are subject to review by the department, and a local 16 authority shall not determine that any paved farm-to-market 17 road, or highway or street road designated as a truck route, 18 is not valid for purposes of an all-systems permit without 19 justification. A highway or street under the jurisdiction of 20 a local authority upon which movement under an all-systems 21 permit is valid shall connect with a highway or street under 22 the jurisdiction of the state, or with another highway or 23 street upon which movement under an all-systems permit is valid 24 that ultimately connects with a highway or street under the 25 jurisdiction of the state. 26 (2) A local authority that indicates determines a highway or 27 street, including a paved farm-to-market road, secondary road, 28 or road designated as a truck route upon which an all-systems 29 permit is not valid under subparagraph (1) shall provide a 30 written justification report to the department explaining the 31 local authorityâs determination in accordance with subparagraph 32 (1) . If the department disagrees with the local authorityâs 33 determination, the dispute shall be resolved in accordance with 34 chapter 17A rules adopted by the department . 35 -1- LSB 1385SV (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 S.F. 390 (3) Notwithstanding a local authorityâs determination under 1 this paragraph, a person who is issued an all-systems permit 2 may operate a permitted vehicle over the most direct route 3 between the location where the vehicle is loaded or is to be 4 unloaded and the nearest highway or street upon which movement 5 under an all-systems permit is valid. If all roads leading to 6 and from a loading or unloading location used by a permitted 7 vehicle are designated as not valid, a local authority shall 8 cooperate with the department to find an alternate route for 9 the permitted vehicle over the shortest practicable distance. 10 (4) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 11 to implement and administer this paragraph. 12 Sec. 2. Section 321E.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 2. Vehicles with indivisible or divisible loads having an 15 overall width not to exceed the width authorized under section 16 321.454 , an overall length not to exceed the length authorized 17 under section 321.457 , an overall height not to exceed the 18 height authorized under section 321.456 , and a total gross 19 weight not to exceed the gross weight authorized under section 20 321.463 by more than twelve and one-half percent, may operate 21 under an all-systems permit and shall obtain route approval 22 from the department. Permitted vehicles under this subsection 23 with a gross weight exceeding eighty thousand pounds shall not 24 be allowed to travel on any portion of the interstate road 25 system. 26 Sec. 3. Section 321E.9, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 27 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 28 Sec. 4. Section 321E.12, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 1. a. A vehicle traveling under permit shall be registered 31 for the gross weight of the vehicle and load. A trip permit 32 issued according to section 326.23 shall not be used in lieu of 33 the registration provided for in this section . 34 b. For purposes of this section, a vehicle traveling 35 -2- LSB 1385SV (4) 91 th/ns 2/ 4 S.F. 390 under a single-trip permit issued under section 321E.9 may be 1 registered with the department for the combined gross weight 2 of the vehicle and load on a single-trip basis. The fee for 3 single-trip registration is four dollars per ton exceeding 4 forty tons. 5